Maine, session 132, LD1819.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §13083-S-1, sub-§3, ¶F, as enacted by PL 2009, c. 641, §9, is
amended to read:
F. Payments to the fund are not allowed for calendar years beginning on or after
January 1, 2031 2035. If at least 5,000 8,000 net new jobs are created in the base area
prior to 2031 2035, the services funded under paragraphs A and B must be reviewed
by the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over economic
development matters in order to determine whether continuance of the fund is
necessary.
Sec. 2. Annual financial report; strategic plan. The Midcoast Regional
Redevelopment Authority shall include in its annual financial report for fiscal year 2025-
26 pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, section 13083-S, subsection 1 a strategic
plan for the transfer of properties from the possession of the authority to a public or private
party.
Page 1 - 132LR0094(05)